Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB586.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 103 of the act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act, is amended by 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 adding definitions to read:Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Animal processing waste." Residual materials in liquid or solid form generated in the slaughtering of poultry and livestock or in processing and converting fish, seafood, milk, meat or eggs to food products.* * *"Food processing residuals." Animal processing waste and vegetative processing waste."Food processing residuals data sheet." A written document that meets the requirements established by the State Conservation Commission, in consultation with the Department of Agriculture, and specifies the quantity, content, characterization, origin, age, prior possessors and processing of food processing residuals, dates and parties to any prior transfers of possession, intended site for storage prior to land application, if applicable, and intended site of land application in the course of normal farming operation.* * *"Hauler or broker of food processing residuals ." A person who for a fee or other remuneration provides transport or application or coordination for transport or application of food processing residuals from or to land owned or controlled by another person or municipality.* * *"Land application system." A written, site-specific plan 20250HB0586PN0595 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that incorporates best management practices for the use, storage and application of food processing residuals . * * *"Vegetative processing waste." Residual materials in liquid or solid form generated in the processing, converting or manufacturing of fruits, vegetables or crops into marketable food items.Section 2. Section 104(17) and (18) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 104. Powers and duties of the department.The department in consultation with the Department of Health regarding matters of public health significance shall have the power and its duty shall be to:* * *(17) administer funds collected by the United States Government and granted to Pennsylvania for the purpose of closing, maintaining or monitoring abandoned or closed hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal sites and for the purpose of action to abate or prevent pollution at such sites. If Congress has not authorized the collection of such funds within one year after the effective date of this act, or if the department finds that the funding program authorized is inadequate, the department shall transmit to the General Assembly within 15 months after the effective date of this act a proposal for the establishment of a fund in Pennsylvania comprised of surcharges collected from users of hazardous waste storage, treatment and disposal facilities excluding captive facilities in the Commonwealth. Such fund shall be proposed for the purpose of closing, maintaining or monitoring hazardous waste storage, treatment or disposal 20250HB0586PN0595 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sites excluding captive facilities which have been abandoned or which have been closed for at least 20 years, and for the purpose of taking action to abate or prevent pollution at such closed or abandoned sites; [and](18) encourage the beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste when the department determines that such use does not harm or present a threat of harm to the health, safety or welfare of the people or environment of this Commonwealth. The department shall establish waste regulations to effectuate the beneficial use of municipal and residual waste, including regulations for the issuance of general permits for any category of beneficial use or processing of municipal waste or residual waste on a regional or Statewide basis in accordance with the regulations adopted by the Environmental Quality Board. The department may or may not require insurance under section 502(e) or bonds under section 505(a) for any general permit or class of general permits promulgated under this paragraph. Except with the written approval of the department, no waste may be stored for longer than one year. Residual wastes being stored shall be monitored for changes in physical and chemical properties, including leachability, pursuant to applicable regulations, by the person or municipality beneficially using or processing such waste. The department may require the submission of periodic analyses or other information to [insure] ensure that the quality of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed does not change. A municipality or person beneficially using or processing the residual waste shall immediately notify the department, upon forms provided by department, of any change in the physical 20250HB0586PN0595 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or chemical properties of the residual waste, including leachability; and the department shall conduct an investigation and order necessary corrective action. Upon receipt of a signed, written complaint of any person whose health, safety or welfare may be adversely affected by a physical or chemical change in the properties of residual waste to be beneficially used or processed, including leachability, the department shall determine the validity of the complaint and take appropriate action[.];(19) in coordination with the Department of Agriculture and the State Conservation Commission, develop, update and maintain a manual establishing the best practices for the processing, characterization, use, storage and application of food processing residuals in accordance with the latest scientific research and evidence-based practices, which shall include, at a minimum, a tiered system for food processing residuals based on content and potential for odors and best practices to manage the impact of odors; and(20) assist the Department of Agriculture and the State Conservation Commission in the development of standards for the land application system, which shall include at least:(i) the minimum standards for construction, location, storage capacity and operation procedures for facilities intended to be used for storage of food processing residuals ; (ii) the conditions under which amendments to the land application system must be made after initial filing;(iii) a process to determine the location of nearby odor receptors and implementation of best odor management 20250HB0586PN0595 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 practices for odors based on the tiered system for food processing residuals being stored or applied; and(iv) the proper forms for the land application system and the notice of intent required to be filed with the State Conservation Commission.Section 3. Section 501(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 501. Permits and licenses required; transition scheme; reporting requirements.(a) It shall be unlawful for any person or municipality to use, or continue to use, their land or the land of any other person or municipality as a solid waste processing, storage, treatment or disposal area without first obtaining a permit from the department as required by this act: Provided, however, That this section shall not apply to the short-term storage of by-products which are utilized in the processing or manufacturing of other products, to the extent that such by-products are not hazardous, and do not create a public nuisance or adversely affect the air, water and other natural resources of the Commonwealth: And provided further, however, That the provisions of this section shall not apply to agricultural waste produced in the course of normal farming operations [nor] provided that the waste is not classified by the Environmental Quality Board as hazardous. This section shall not apply to the use of food processing [wastes] residuals in the course of normal farming operations [provided that such wastes are not classified by the board as hazardous] in accordance with section 509.* * *Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 509. Food processing residuals . (a) The storage and application of food processing residuals 20250HB0586PN0595 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be managed under a land application system , which shall be made in a form and manner determined by the Department of Agriculture, in consultation with the State Conservation Commission.(b) The land application system shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:(1) A description of the construction, location, storage capacity and operation of facilities intended to be used for storage of food processing residuals . (2) A description of setbacks that have been established for the protection of natural resources.(3) A description of nearby odor receptors and an analysis of odor risk , according to the odor site index specifications . (4) A description of siting, site preparation, nutrient availability, crop rotation, field selection, monitoring, recordkeeping, transportation and mechanisms for reviewing land application system performance.(5) Evidence of compliance with local ordinances or zoning restrictions, if applicable, including any permissions or waivers.(6) A statement that the person completing the land application system understands that if the person is operating under both a land application system and a manure management system, the person must comply with the requirements of both.(c) The land application system shall be available for review at the request of the department, the Department of Agriculture or the State Conservation Commission.(d) A person wishing to apply or store food processing 20250HB0586PN0595 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 residuals under a land application system shall file a notice of intent to do so with the State Conservation Commission.(e) A person may not accept the transfer of food processing residuals for storage, use or application from anyone except a hauler or broker of food processing residuals . (f) A person that accepts food processing residuals under this section shall maintain the food processing residuals data sheet received for a period of three years.(g) In addition to any other penalty or proceeding permitted under this act or by law or equity, the department shall assess a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 for a first violation of this section. The department shall assess a civil penalty of not more than $25,000 for a second or subsequent violation of this section. Each day in violation of this section shall be considered a separate offense for the purposes of assessing the penalty under this subsection. This subsection shall not apply to a permit holder under this act that stores or accepts food processing residual waste.(h) If a person is fully and properly implementing a land application system plan of which a notice of intent is filed with the State Conservation Commission and maintained under this chapter, the implementation shall be given appropriate consideration as a mitigating factor in any civil action for penalties or damages alleged to have been caused by the management or utilization of food processing residuals.(i) This chapter is of Statewide concern and occupies the whole field of regulation regarding storage and application of food processing residuals , to the exclusion of all local regulations. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a political subdivision or home rule municipality from adopting and 20250HB0586PN0595 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcing ordinances or regulations which are consistent with and no more stringent than the requirements of this chapter and the regulations or guidelines promulgated under this chapter. A penalty shall not be assessed under any local ordinance or regulation under this subsection for a violation for which a penalty has been assessed under this chapter.(j) The department shall coordinate with the Department of Agriculture and the State Conservation Commission as necessary to implement this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 180 days.20250HB0586PN0595 - 9 - 12345678910